apertium-eo-en.eo.dix.xml
<pardef n="anglikana_eklezio__n">
<e>                           <p><l></l>                    <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>j</l>                   <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>n</l>                   <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>jn</l>                  <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
-->



<pardef n="nomACR__n">
<e>                           <p><l></l>                    <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>-oj</l>                 <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>-on</l>                 <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>-ojn</l>                <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>


<pardef n="nomsen__n">
<e>                           <p><l></l>                    <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l></l>                    <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l></l>                    <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l></l>                    <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>








<pardef n="la__det">
<e>                           <p><l></l>                    <r><s n="det"/><s n="def"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
<e r="RL">                    <p><l></l>                    <r><s n="det"/><s n="def"/><s n="sp"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
<e r="RL">                    <p><l></l>                    <r><s n="det"/><s n="def"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
<e r="RL">                    <p><l></l>                    <r><s n="det"/><s n="def"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
<e r="RL">                    <p><l></l>                    <r><s n="det"/><s n="def"/><s n="sp"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
<e r="RL">                    <p><l></l>                    <r><s n="det"/><s n="def"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
<e r="RL">                    <p><l></l>                    <r><s n="det"/><s n="def"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>


<pardef n="unu__det">
<e>                           <p><l></l>                    <r><s n="det"/><s n="ind"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
<e r="RL">                    <p><l></l>                    <r><s n="det"/><s n="ind"/><s n="sp"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
<e r="RL">                    <p><l></l>                    <r><s n="det"/><s n="ind"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
<e r="RL">                    <p><l></l>                    <r><s n="det"/><s n="ind"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
<e r="RL">                    <p><l></l>                    <r><s n="det"/><s n="ind"/><s n="sp"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
<e r="RL">                    <p><l></l>                    <r><s n="det"/><s n="ind"/><s n="sp"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
<e r="RL">                    <p><l></l>                    <r><s n="det"/><s n="ind"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
<e r="RL">                    <p><l></l>                    <r><s n="det"/><s n="ind"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>


<pardef n="mia__det">
<e r="LR">                    <p><l></l>                    <r><s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
<e r="RL">                    <p><l></l>                    <r><s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="sp"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l></l>                    <r><s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>j</l>                   <r><s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>n</l>                   <r><s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="sp"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>n</l>                   <r><s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>jn</l>                  <r><s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
    
    
<pardef n="dem__det">
<e r="LR">                    <p><l></l>                    <r><s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
<e r="RL">                    <p><l></l>                    <r><s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
<e r="RL">                    <p><l>j</l>                   <r><s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
<e r="RL">                    <p><l>n</l>                   <r><s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
<e r="RL">                    <p><l>jn</l>                  <r><s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
    
    
<pardef n="ind__det">
<e r="LR">                    <p><l></l>                    <r><s n="det"/><s n="ind"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
<e r="RL">                    <p><l></l>                    <r><s n="det"/><s n="ind"/><s n="sp"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
<e r="RL">                    <p><l></l>                    <r><s n="det"/><s n="ind"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
<e r="RL">                    <p><l>j</l>                   <r><s n="det"/><s n="ind"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
<e r="RL">                    <p><l>n</l>                   <r><s n="det"/><s n="ind"/><s n="sp"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
<e r="RL">                    <p><l>n</l>                   <r><s n="det"/><s n="ind"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
<e r="RL">                    <p><l>jn</l>                  <r><s n="det"/><s n="ind"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
    
<pardef n="ambaŭ__det">
<e r="LR">                    <p><l></l>                    <r><s n="det"/><s n="ind"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
<e r="RL">                    <p><l></l>                    <r><s n="det"/><s n="ind"/><s n="sp"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
<e r="RL">                    <p><l></l>                    <r><s n="det"/><s n="ind"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
<e r="RL">                    <p><l></l>                    <r><s n="det"/><s n="ind"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
<e r="RL">                    <p><l></l>                    <r><s n="det"/><s n="ind"/><s n="sp"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
<e r="RL">                    <p><l></l>                    <r><s n="det"/><s n="ind"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
<e r="RL">                    <p><l></l>                    <r><s n="det"/><s n="ind"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
    
<pardef n="quant__det">
<e r="LR">                    <p><l></l>                    <r><s n="det"/><s n="qnt"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
<e r="RL">                    <p><l></l>                    <r><s n="det"/><s n="qnt"/><s n="sp"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
<e r="RL">                    <p><l></l>                    <r><s n="det"/><s n="qnt"/><s n="sp"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
<e r="RL">                    <p><l></l>                    <r><s n="det"/><s n="qnt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
<e r="RL">                    <p><l>j</l>                   <r><s n="det"/><s n="qnt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
<e r="RL">                    <p><l>n</l>                   <r><s n="det"/><s n="qnt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
<e r="RL">                    <p><l>jn</l>                  <r><s n="det"/><s n="qnt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<e lm="mia">                  <i>mia</i><par n="mia__det"/></e>
<e lm="via">                  <i>via</i><par n="mia__det"/></e>
<e lm="ŝia">                  <par n="ŝ"/><i>ia</i><par n="mia__det"/></e>
<e lm="ĝia">                  <par n="ĝ"/><i>ia</i><par n="mia__det"/></e>
<e lm="lia">                  <i>lia</i><par n="mia__det"/></e>
<e lm="nia">                  <i>nia</i><par n="mia__det"/></e>
<e lm="ilia">                 <i>ilia</i><par n="mia__det"/></e>
<e lm="ajna">                 <i>ajna</i><par n="ind__det"/></e>
<e lm="alia">                 <i>alia</i><par n="ind__det"/></e>
<e lm="ambaŭ">                <i>amba</i><par n="ŭ"/><i></i><par n="ambaŭ__det"/></e>
<e lm="certa">                <i>certa</i><par n="ind__det"/></e>
<e lm="ĉiu">                  <par n="ĉ"/><i>iu</i><par n="ind__det"/></e>
<e lm="ĉiu">                  <par n="ĉ"/><i>iu</i><par n="quant__det"/></e>
<e lm="tiu">                  <i>tiu</i><par n="dem__det"/></e>
    <e lm="ĉi tiu"><par n="ĉ"/><p><l>i<b/>tiu</l><r>i<b/>tiu<par n="dem__det"/></r></p></e>
<e lm="diversa">              <i>diversa</i><par n="ind__det"/></e>
<e lm="iu">                   <i>iu</i><par n="quant__det"/></e>
<e lm="kelka">                <i>kelka</i><par n="quant__det"/></e>
<e lm="la">                   <i>la</i><par n="la__det"/></e>
<e lm="unu">                  <i>unu</i><par n="unu__det"/></e>
<e lm="la sama">              <i>la<b/>sama</i><par n="ind__det"/></e>
<e lm="malmulta">             <i>malmulta</i><par n="quant__det"/></e>
<e lm="multa">                <i>multa</i><par n="quant__det"/></e>
<e lm="neniu">                <i>neniu</i><par n="ind__det"/></e>
<e lm="plura">                <i>plura</i><par n="ind__det"/></e>
<e lm="tia">                  <i>tia</i><par n="ind__det"/></e>
<e lm="KD">                   <i>KD</i><par n="nomACR__n"/></e>
<e lm="don">                  <i>don</i><par n="nomsen__n"/></e>
<e lm="kg.">                  <i>kg.</i><par n="nomsen__n"/></e>
<e lm="km.">                  <i>km.</i><par n="nomsen__n"/></e>
